Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2237
Constables and sheriffs; take person into custody; procedure.

When it shall become the duty of the officer to take the body of any person to the jail of the county, he shall deliver to the sheriff or jailer a certified copy of the execution, commitment or other processes, whereby he holds such person in custody, and return the original to the clerk who issued the same, which copy shall be sufficient authority to the sheriff or jailer to keep the prisoner in jail until discharged by due course of law.

Laws 1929, c. 82, art. XV, § 178, p. 325;

C.S.1929, § 22-1508;

R.S.1943, § 26-1,179;

R.S.1943, (1979), § 26-1,179;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-5,102.